District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.57

Consequences of failure to request hearing or submit additional information to clarify eligibility.

If, after 15 days from the date of postmark of the written notice, the recipient does not request a fair hearing, or if applicable, does not submit additional information to clarify his eligibility status, the representative of the Mayor shall take immediate action to reduce or terminate the assistance payment, and shall notify the recipient in writing of the action taken, and its effective date.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 557, 29 DCR 1060
Sept. 10, 1985, D.C. Law 6-35, § 2(k), 32 DCR 3778

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.57.